Maryland, session 2026, HB1181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
5–525.
(a) (1) In this section, “disability” means:
(i) a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or
more of an individual’s major life activities;
(ii) a record of having a physical or mental impairment that
substantially limits one or more of an individual’s major life activities; or
(iii) being regarded as having a physical or mental impairment that
substantially limits one or more of an individual’s major life activities.
(2) “Disability” shall be construed in accordance with the ADA
Amendments Act of 2008, P.L. 110–325.
(b) (1) The Administration shall establish a program of out–of–home
placement for minor children:
(i) who are placed in the custody of a local department, for a period
of not more than 180 days, by a parent or legal guardian under a voluntary placement
agreement;
(ii) who are abused, abandoned, neglected, or dependent, if a
juvenile court:
1. has determined that continued residence in the child’s
home is contrary to the child’s welfare; and
2. has committed the child to the custody or guardianship of
a local department; or
(iii) who, with the approval of the Administration, are placed in an
out–of–home placement by a local department under a voluntary placement agreement
subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection.

HOUSE BILL 1181
(2) (i) A local department may not seek legal GUARDIANSHIP OR
custody of a child under a voluntary placement agreement if the child has a developmental
disability or a mental illness and the purpose of the voluntary placement agreement is to
obtain treatment or care related to the child’s disability that the parent is unable to provide.
(ii) A child described in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph may
remain in an out–of–home placement, INCLUDING A RESIDENTIAL PLACEMENT, under
a voluntary placement agreement for more than 180 days if the child’s disability
necessitates care or treatment in the out–of–home placement and a juvenile court makes a
finding that continuation of the placement is in the best interests of the child.
(iii) Each local department shall designate, from existing staff, a staff
person to administer requests for voluntary placement agreements for children with
developmental disabilities or mental illnesses.
(IV) IF A LOCAL DEPARTMENT RECEIVES A REQUEST FOR A
VOLUNTARY PLACEMENT AGREEMENT, THE LOCAL DEPARTMENT SHALL:
1. WITHIN 5 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE
REQUEST, SCHEDULE AN ASSESSMENT MEETING WITH THE CHILD’S FAMILY AND
TREATING PROVIDER; AND
2. WITHIN 5 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER THE ASSESSMENT
MEETING, ISSUE A WRITTEN ELIGIBILITY DETERMINATION TO THE CHILD’S FAMILY
AND REFERRING PROVIDER.
(V) 1. EACH LOCAL DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT ANY
DELAY IN ASSESSING THE CHILD AND PROVIDING AN ELIGIBILITY DETERMINATION
AS REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (IV) OF THIS PARAGRAPH TO THE
ADMINISTRATION, INCLUDING REASONS FOR THE DELAY AND CORRECTIVE
ACTIONS TAKEN BY THE LOCAL DEPARTMENT.
2. NOTHING IN THIS SUBPARAGRAPH MAY BE
INTERPRETED TO PREVENT A LOCAL CARE TEAM FROM PROVIDING THE CHILD AND
FAMILY WITH ALTERNATIVE OR INTERIM SERVICES.
[(iv)] (VI) Each local department shall report annually to the
Administration on the number of requests for voluntary placement agreements for children
with developmental disabilities or mental illnesses that have been received, the outcome of
each request, and the reason for each denial.
[(v) On receipt of a request for a voluntary placement agreement for
a child with a developmental disability or a mental illness, a local department shall discuss
the child’s case at the next meeting of the local care team for the purpose of determining

HOUSE BILL 1181 5
whether any alternative or interim services for the child and family may be provided by
any agency.]
(3) (i) The Administration shall establish a program of out–of–home
placement for former CINAs:
1. whose commitment to a local department was rescinded
after the individuals reached the age of 18 years but before the individuals reached the age
of 20 years and 6 months; and
2. who did not exit foster care due to reunification, adoption,
guardianship, marriage, or uniformed services duty.
(ii) The Administration shall adopt regulations that include
eligibility requirements in accordance with federal law and regulations for providing
assistance to individuals at least 18 years old.
(iii) A local department may not seek legal custody of a former CINA
under a voluntary placement agreement.
(iv) A former CINA described in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph
may remain in an out–of–home placement under a voluntary placement agreement for
more than 180 days if the former CINA continues to comply with the voluntary placement
agreement and a juvenile court makes a finding that the continuation of the placement is
in the best interests of the former CINA.
(v) 1. A local department shall advise a child, in writing, before
emancipation of the right to reenter care and the procedures for reentering care under this
paragraph.
2. If a local department has knowledge that a former CINA
described in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph is homeless, as defined in 42 U.S.C. §
11434a, including by obtaining information regarding the former CINA’s homelessness in
an application for public assistance or through contact between the former CINA and a
caseworker, the local department shall contact the former CINA and advise the former
CINA of the right to reenter care and procedures for reentering care under this paragraph.
(c) In establishing the out–of–home placement program the Administration shall:
(1) provide time–limited family reunification services to a child placed in
an out–of–home placement and to the parents or guardian of the child, in order to facilitate
the child’s safe and appropriate reunification within a timely manner;
(2) concurrently develop and implement a permanency plan that is in the
best interests of the child; and

HOUSE BILL 1181
(3) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH, provide training on an annual basis for the staff at each local department who
administer requests for voluntary placement agreements for children with developmental
disabilities or mental illnesses under subsection (b) of this section, INCLUDING TRAINING
ON:
(I) TIMELINE AND PROCEDURAL COMPLIANCE;
(II) TRAUMA–INFORMED FAMILY ENGAGEMENT; AND
(III) INTERAGENCY COORDINATION.
(d) (1) The local department shall provide 24–hour a day care and supportive
services for a child who is committed to its custody or guardianship in an out–of–home
placement on a short–term basis or placed in accordance with a voluntary placement
agreement.
(2) (i) A child may not be committed to the custody or guardianship of
a local department and placed in an out–of–home placement solely because the child’s
parent or guardian lacks shelter or has a disability or solely because the child’s parents are
financially unable to provide treatment or care for a child with a developmental disability
or mental illness.
(ii) The local department shall make appropriate referrals to
emergency shelter services and other services for the homeless family with a child which
lacks shelter.
(e) (1) Unless a court orders that reasonable efforts are not required under §
3–812 of the Courts Article or § 5–323 of this title, reasonable efforts shall be made to
preserve and reunify families:
(i) prior to the placement of a child in an out–of–home placement,
to prevent or eliminate the need for removing the child from the child’s home; and
(ii) to make it possible for a child to safely return to the child’s home.
(2) In determining the reasonable efforts to be made and in making the
reasonable efforts described under paragraph (1) of this subsection[,]:
(I) A CHILD’S PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN NEED NOT
EXHAUST ALL HOME– AND COMMUNITY–BASED SERVICES; AND
(II) the child’s safety and health shall be the primary concern.

HOUSE BILL 1181 7
(3) Reasonable efforts to place a child for adoption or with a legal guardian
may be made concurrently with the reasonable efforts described under paragraph (1) of this
subsection.
(4) If continuation of reasonable efforts to reunify the child with the child’s
parents or guardian is determined to be inconsistent with the permanency plan for the
child:
(i) reasonable efforts shall be made to place the child in a timely
manner in accordance with the permanency plan, including consideration of both in–State
and out–of–state placements, and to complete the steps to finalize the permanent
placement of the child; and
(ii) in a case in which the parent of the child is receiving treatment
in a residential substance use disorder treatment program with beds or services for
patients’ children and the child is in the presence of the child’s parent for the duration of
the child’s parent’s treatment, the local department shall file a report with the court that
explains:
1. why the child was not placed with the parent;
2. any efforts the local department has made toward
placement of the child; and
3. any difficulties with placing the child with the parent.
(M) (1) A PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN WHO ENTERS INTO A VOLUNTARY
PLACEMENT AGREEMENT UNDER THIS SECTION RETAINS ALL LEGAL AND
EDUCATIONAL DECISION–MAKING RIGHTS, UNLESS OTHERWISE AGREED.
(2) A LOCAL DEPARTMENT MAY NOT REQUIRE A PARENT OR LEGAL
GUARDIAN TO RELINQUISH CUSTODY OR GUARDIANSHIP OF A CHILD TO ACCESS
SERVICES.
(N) (1) A LOCAL DEPARTMENT SHALL NOTIFY THE PARENT OR LEGAL
GUARDIAN OF A CHILD SUBJECT TO A VOLUNTARY PLACEMENT AGREEMENT OF THE
RIGHT TO PETITION THE COURT FOR A MODIFICATION OF AN EXISTING CHILD
SUPPORT OBLIGATION.
(2) (I) 1. THE EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2
OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, THE ADMINISTRATION AND THE CHILD SUPPORT
ENFORCEMENT ADMINISTRATION SHALL COLLABORATE TO ESTABLISH UNIFORM
CRITERIA FOR WAIVING OR REDUCING CHILD SUPPORT OBLIGATIONS FOR
LOW–INCOME FAMILIES WHO ENTER MAY NOT REFER A CHILD’S CASE TO THE CHILD

HOUSE BILL 1181
SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT ADMINISTRATION IF THE CHILD’S FAMILY ENTERS INTO A
VOLUNTARY PLACEMENT AGREEMENT UNDER THIS SECTION.
(II) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, THE CHILD SUPPORT
ENFORCEMENT ADMINISTRATION SHALL FILE A MOTION TO MODIFY ANY CHILD
SUPPORT ORDER ISSUED UNDER A VOLUNTARY PLACEMENT AGREEMENT.
2. THE ADMINISTRATION MAY REFER THE CASE OF A
CHILD WHOSE FAMILY HAS ENTERED INTO A VOLUNTARY PLACEMENT AGREEMENT
UNDER THIS SECTION TO THE CHILD SUPPORT ADMINISTRATION IF A CHILD
SUPPORT ORDER WILL NOT ADVERSELY AFFECT THE CHILD OR IMPEDE THE
COMPLETION OF THE CHILD’S PERMANENCY PLAN.
(II) THE COURT MAY NOT ORDER THE PAYMENT OF CHILD
SUPPORT BY THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF A CHILD PLACED IN OUT–OF–HOME
PLACEMENT BY A LOCAL DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH A VOLUNTARY
PLACEMENT AGREEMENT UNDER THIS SECTION IF A CHILD SUPPORT ORDER WILL
ADVERSELY AFFECT THE CHILD OR IMPEDE THE COMPLETION OF THE CHILD’S
PERMANENCY PLAN.
(III) THE STATE MAY NOT ACCEPT AN ASSIGNMENT OF THE
RIGHT TO CHILD SUPPORT FOR A CHILD PLACED IN AN OUT–OF–HOME PLACEMENT
BY A LOCAL DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH A VOLUNTARY PLACEMENT
AGREEMENT UNDER THIS SECTION IF THE ADMINISTRATION DETERMINES THAT THE
ASSIGNMENT OF AN EXISTING SUPPORT OBLIGATION TO THE STATE WILL
ADVERSELY AFFECT THE CHILD OR IMPEDE THE COMPLETION OF THE CHILD’S
PERMANENCY PLAN.
(O) (1) A THE LOCAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH AUTHORITY SHALL BE
NOTIFIED OF A CHILD WITH SPECIAL NEEDS WHO IS THE SUBJECT OF A VOLUNTARY
PLACEMENT AGREEMENT REQUEST FOR PSYCHIATRIC RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT
AND WHO IS ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE SHALL BE REFERRED
DIRECTLY TO THE LOCAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH AUTHORITY.
(2) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE INTERPRETED TO
PREVENT A LOCAL CARE TEAM FROM PROVIDING THE CHILD AND FAMILY WITH
ALTERNATIVE OR INTERIM SERVICES.
(P) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, AND EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER,
EACH LOCAL DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT:
(I) THE NUMBER OF VOLUNTARY PLACEMENT AGREEMENT
REQUESTS RECEIVED IN THE PRECEDING YEAR;

HOUSE BILL 1181 9
(II) THE AVERAGE TIME IT TOOK FOR THE LOCAL DEPARTMENT
TO MAKE A DETERMINATION AND PLACEMENT;
(III) THE NUMBER OF REQUESTS THAT WERE DENIED AND THE
REASONS FOR THE DENIALS; AND
(IV) THE AVERAGE LENGTH OF A HOSPITAL STAY FOR A CHILD
AWAITING A PLACEMENT.
(2) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER DECEMBER 1, 2027, AND EACH
SEPTEMBER DECEMBER 1 THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH ON ITS
WEBSITE AGGREGATED STATEWIDE DATA COMPILED FROM THE LOCAL
DEPARTMENT REPORTS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
Chapter 479 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) In this section, “child in an unlicensed setting” means an individual
under the age of 21 years in an out–of–home placement who is residing in a hotel, an office
building, a shelter, or any other unlicensed setting.
(2) “Child in an unlicensed setting” does not include an individual under
the age of 21 years who is receiving a self–independent living stipend, living with kin
awaiting approval for a placement, or on aftercare with a parent.
(b) (1) There is a Workgroup on Children in Unlicensed Settings and Pediatric
Hospital Overstays in the State.
(2) The Workgroup shall consist of representatives who have experience
and knowledge of working with children with behavioral health challenges, adverse
childhood experiences, and developmental disabilities, including:
(i) the Secretary of Health, or the Secretary’s designee;
(ii) the Secretary of Human Services, or the Secretary’s designee;
(iii) the Secretary of Juvenile Services, or the Secretary’s designee;
(iv) the State Public Defender, or the State Public Defender’s
designee; and
(v) the following members, appointed by the Governor:

HOUSE BILL 1181
1. one representative of the Maryland Association of
Resources for Families and Youth;
2. one representative of Disability Rights Maryland;
3. one representative of the Community Behavioral Health
Association of Maryland;
4. one representative of Maryland Legal Aid;
5. one representative of the Court Appointed Special
Advocates of Maryland;
6. one representative of the National Association of Social
Workers – Maryland who is a hospital–based clinical social worker;
7. one representative of the Maryland Chapter of the
American Academy of Pediatrics;
8. one representative of the Maryland Hospital Association;
9. one representative of a specialty psychiatric hospital;
10. one representative of a residential treatment provider in
the State; and
11. one representative of a family of a child in foster care, as
defined in § 8–101(h) of the Human Services Article.
(3) The members of the Workgroup shall elect the chair and vice chair of
the Workgroup.
(4) The Workgroup shall meet before August 1, 2025, and at least once
every 30 days thereafter.
(5) The State Council on Child Abuse and Neglect shall provide staff for
the Workgroup.
(6) A member of the Workgroup:
(i) may not receive compensation as a member of the Workgroup;
but
(ii) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard
State Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(c) (1) The Workgroup shall:

HOUSE BILL 1181 11
(i) complete an assessment of the number, type, and cost of the
additional beds and supportive services needed to place all children in pediatric overstays
and other unlicensed settings in the least restrictive settings;
(ii) develop a comprehensive and sustainable resource development
plan designed to increase the number of licensed settings and end the use of pediatric
overstays and unlicensed settings;
(iii) develop an implementation plan with comprehensive data to
inform the plan; [and]
(iv) determine the anticipated timeline for when the practice of
placing children in unlicensed settings will cease;
(V) STUDY VOLUNTARY PLACEMENT AGREEMENTS FOR
CHILDREN WITH A DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITY OR MENTAL ILLNESS; AND
(VI) RECOMMEND STATUTORY AND BUDGETARY CHANGES
NECESSARY TO TRANSFER FUNDING FROM THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES
TO THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH.
(2) On or before October 1, [2025] 2026, the Workgroup shall report its
findings and recommendations to the Governor, THE JOINT COMMITTEE ON CHILDREN,
YOUTH, AND FAMILIES, and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, the General Assembly.
Chapter 480 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) In this section, “child in an unlicensed setting” means an individual
under the age of 21 years in an out–of–home placement who is residing in a hotel, an office
building, a shelter, or any other unlicensed setting.
(2) “Child in an unlicensed setting” does not include an individual under
the age of 21 years who is receiving a self–independent living stipend, living with kin
awaiting approval for a placement, or on aftercare with a parent.
(b) (1) There is a Workgroup on Children in Unlicensed Settings and Pediatric
Hospital Overstays in the State.
(2) The Workgroup shall consist of representatives who have experience
and knowledge of working with children with behavioral health challenges, adverse
childhood experiences, and developmental disabilities, including:

HOUSE BILL 1181
(i) the Secretary of Health, or the Secretary’s designee;
(ii) the Secretary of Human Services, or the Secretary’s designee;
(iii) the Secretary of Juvenile Services, or the Secretary’s designee;
(iv) the State Public Defender, or the State Public Defender’s
designee; and
(v) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
1. one representative of the Maryland Association of
Resources for Families and Youth;
2. one representative of Disability Rights Maryland;
3. one representative of the Community Behavioral Health
Association of Maryland;
4. one representative of Maryland Legal Aid;
5. one representative of the Court Appointed Special
Advocates of Maryland;
6. one representative of the National Association of Social
Workers – Maryland who is a hospital–based clinical social worker;
7. one representative of the Maryland Chapter of the
American Academy of Pediatrics;
8. one representative of the Maryland Hospital Association;
9. one representative of a specialty psychiatric hospital;
10. one representative of a residential treatment provider in
the State; and
11. one representative of a family of a child in foster care, as
defined in § 8–101(h) of the Human Services Article.
(3) The members of the Workgroup shall elect the chair and vice chair of
the Workgroup.
(4) The Workgroup shall meet before August 1, 2025, and at least once
every 30 days thereafter.

HOUSE BILL 1181 13
(5) The State Council on Child Abuse and Neglect shall provide staff for
the Workgroup.
(6) A member of the Workgroup:
(i) may not receive compensation as a member of the Workgroup;
but
(ii) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard
State Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(c) (1) The Workgroup shall:
(i) complete an assessment of the number, type, and cost of the
additional beds and supportive services needed to place all children in pediatric overstays
and other unlicensed settings in the least restrictive settings;
(ii) develop a comprehensive and sustainable resource development
plan designed to increase the number of licensed settings and end the use of pediatric
overstays and unlicensed settings;
(iii) develop an implementation plan with comprehensive data to
inform the plan; [and]
(iv) determine the anticipated timeline for when the practice of
placing children in unlicensed settings will cease;
(V) STUDY VOLUNTARY PLACEMENT AGREEMENTS FOR
CHILDREN WITH A DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITY OR MENTAL ILLNESS; AND
(VI) RECOMMEND STATUTORY AND BUDGETARY CHANGES
NECESSARY TO TRANSFER FUNDING FROM THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES
TO THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH.
(2) On or before October 1, [2025] 2026, the Workgroup shall report its
findings and recommendations to the Governor, THE JOINT COMMITTEE ON CHILDREN,
YOUTH, AND FAMILIES, and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before October 1, 2029,
the Department of Human Services and the Maryland Department of Health shall submit
a joint report to the Governor, the Joint Committee on Children, Youth, and Families, and,
in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly that
contains the following information concerning children who are placed in an out–of–home
placement under a voluntary placement agreement:

HOUSE BILL 1181
(1) the impact on hospital discharge delays;
(2) family outcomes and reunification rates;
(3) the implementation status of voluntary placement agreement reform;
and
(4) recommendations for changes in the law.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the balance of any child
support owed to the State before the effective date of this Act for a child whose parent or
guardian has entered into a voluntary placement agreement with a local department shall
be unenforceable and uncollectable on the taking effect of this Act.
SECTION 3. 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.